Alabama, session 2026rs, HB290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This bill shall be known and cited as the
Nursing Mother's Act.
Section 2. (a) As used in this section, the term
"employer" means an individual or entity that employs one or
more employees, including all departments, agencies,
authorities, and any other office of this state and its
Page 1

authorities, and any other office of this state and its
HB290 INTRODUCED
political subdivisions.
(b)(1) An employer shall provide an employee with
reasonable, unpaid break time or shall permit an employee to
use paid break time or meal time each day to express breast
milk.
(2) The break time, if possible, shall run concurrently
with any break time already provided to the employee.
(3) This section does not require an employer to
provide break time if doing so would create an undue hardship
on the operations of the employer.
(4) The employee shall make reasonable efforts to
minimize disruption to the employer's operations.
(c)(1) The employer shall make reasonable efforts to
provide a room or other location, other than a bathroom, in
close proximity to the work area, where an employee may
express breast milk in privacy.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require an employer to build a room for the primary purpose of
expressing breast milk.
(d) An employer may not discriminate against an
employee for choosing to express breast milk in the workplace
in compliance with this section.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2